ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nb_NO/hyph_nb_NO.dic
bro1s2
ba1na
ban4de1ne
ban1de
ba1no
ba3ri
ba1ro
3bad
ba3ke2r.
ba1ke
bak3e2tt
ba3kr
bak1l
ba1la
ba1lu
bau1
2b1d
2bs
b1st
b1sk
b1so
b1så
bæ1ru
b1t
2b1k
b2li
4bli1kas
bli1ka
4bli1ku
4blen
2b1b
bo1v
b2o1re
bo1ra
bos2
bos1t
bo1s1te
bo1ta
bo2kr
bo1p
bo1li
by1n
bu1na
bu1en
bu1es
bu1ri
bu1re
bu1ti
bu1ta
bu1tø
bu1le
bu1la
bu1o
bå1re
of3fa
o2fei
o1fe
of1ri
of1r2e.
of1res
ofrel4
o1fj
o1fo
ofo2r2f
oforfat4
ofor1fa
o1in
oin1ge1
o1ni
o4nin2g2s
on1na
o1na
on1da2
ond1s
ons1v
on1s2t
onspresiden4
onspre3sid
onspre1si
onspresi1de
o3næ1re
ongefami1li3
on1ge
onge1fa
ongefa1mi
on1gl
on1of
on1ok
on1opp
o1nol
o1nom
o1nu
on1c
o1e
o2e1i
o1vi
ove2
o1vei
ove3ne
ove3ri
ove1r1e
ov1r
ov1o1v
ov1or
o2r1in
o4rief
ori4er
o2rie1b
o1ris
o1rit
orn1s
or1nu
2ore
o1r2e.
orenin4ger
orenin1ge
ore3n2e.
ore1ne
or3en1te
or1enk
o1rer
o1ret.
or1e2l1s
o1rem.
3orvei.
or1v
or1an
o2r1av
orasjo4
ora1sj
o1rat
o2ra2le
or1all
or3di
ord3et2s
or1de
ord1sk
ord1sp
or1sn
o2rs2
or1sak4
or1sp
or1sl
or1æ2r.
or1æ1ri
or3ær2e.
oræ1re
1or1ga
or1g
orkes1
o2rk
or1ke
or1o4v
or1or
or1y
or1u
or1å
or1øv
or1øk
or1øy
o1a
oa1n
oa2r2b
oarbei2
oarbei1de4
oa1g
2odis1ke
o1di
oda2g
o1da
o2d1ap
od1sn
od1s2t
od1sk
od1sp
od1tr
od1tø
od1å
odår1
o1dé
osi1f
o1si
osi1o
os1n
os1ar
1o2s1d
ost1or
os1ki
o1sko
o1sky
os1li
o3so
o1sy
o2gef
o1ge
ogrunn2
o1gr2
og1le
og1lu
o1go
o1ti
o4tiver
oti1ve
ot3ive1ri
o2t1i1va
ote1i
o1te
o2t1ekt
ot1v
o1tr
ot1av
ot1ar
ot1s2
ot1to
o2tt
ot1tu
ott1å
o1to1ri
o1t2o1re
ot1o2rs2
ot1o2rk
o1ty
o1tu
o1ki
o1kr
ok1ru
o1ka
ok1sa
o2ks
ok1s1te
oks2t
ok1sk
ok2sp
ok1ki
ok1ka
ok1ko
o1kl
o1ko
o1ku
ok1ut
o1pi
op1rå
o1pa
opp3r
op2pa
1opp1g
opp3l
o1pl
2o1po
o1pu1
o1li2n.
o1li1ni
o1li1ne
oli4gen
o1lig
oli1ge
o1le
o1la
1ol1j
o1lo
o2l1o2s.
o2l1op
o2l1o2b
o1lu
o1lø
o1j
o2b
o3bi
o3be
1ob1ri
3o3bre1re
ob1res
o3ba
o3bl
o4b2li
ob3lin
ob3lend2
o4blen
ob1j
o3bo
o3bu
o3bø
o1or
om1ed
o1me
o3met.
1om1r
2omro
o2m1ar
o1ma
oms3ti
oms2
omo2te
o1mo
o1mu
o1ui
o1un
ou1ri
o1us
y1f
y1i
y1ni
yn1il
yn4dighe4ter
yn1di
yndi2g1h
yndighe1te
yndrin4
ynd3rin2g.
yndrin1g3e4
yns1v
yn1s2k
yns1p
yn1gl
y1no
y1e
y2e2a
ye1lo
y2h1r
y1h
y1vi
y1ve
y1vå1
y1ri
y1re
yren4
y1ra
yr1ds
yr1dø
yr1sl
y2rs2
y1ru
y1rå
yrå1k
y1a
ya1l
yde1ro
y1de
yd1ri
yd1s
yd1o
ys1n
y2s3es1te
y1se
y2s1et2s
y1sa
ys1s2t
y2ss
ys1ti
ys1tra
ys1tal
y1sty
ysk1l
y1sko
ys1l
y2sj
y1so
ys1å
y1gl
y1gu
y1ti
yt2na
yt1n
yt2s1e
ytt1å
y2tt
y1to
y1ty
y1t1u
y1ki
yk1n
yke1i
y1ke
yk1ki
y1kl
y2k1lin
y1kj
y1ko
y1ku
y1pi
y1pe
y1pr
ypres3t
y1pa
yp1s
y1pl
y1po
y1li
y1le
yl1v
yl2ve
y1la
y1læ
ylkes1
yl1k
yl1ke
y1lo
y1ly
yba2
y1b
ybaser2
yba1se
ybu1
y1op
y1om
y1mu1
y1må
y1å
m1f
1mi
4mi4nis4tre4res
mi1ni
mi1nis
minis1tr
ministre1re
min3n
4mina1re
mi1na
min3d
mi1r
mi2s
mi1s1a
mis1ta
4milie1fe
mi1li
mili2e
4mi2lie1fø
4mi2lie3san
milies2
milie1sa
4miliem
mi1la
mi2lo
m1n
mnes1
m1ne
1me
2meie
me1isk
me1ni
m2e1na
2menbre
men1b
me1ru
med1it
me1di
me2dy
me3s2ted
mes1te
mes3tre
me1sto
me1sk
me1sl
me3so
me1gl
me4tr
2me1to
me1k1n
mekra2ft4
me1kr
me1kraf
me2k1li
me1kl
me1la
mel1s1i
me2l1s
me1lo
mhu1
m1h
m1v
m1r
1ma
2maf
ma1na
ma1nø
m2a2r.
ma1ro
2mad
ma1dr
ma2tr
mat1re
mat1s
ma1kr
2map
2m1ald
m1d
ms2
m1sn
ms3ve
msa2
ms3an
ms3a1ge
m2s3s
m1s1te
m1str
m1sta
m1sto
m1sk
msku1e
m1sp
ms3li
ms3lan
m1sy
m1su
ms3å
1mæ
mærfo1
mæ2r1f
m1g
m1ti
m1tr
m1ta
m1to
m1ty
m1k2
m1p
m1pe3a
m2p1s
m1l
1mo
mo1no
2m1ov
mo1ri
m2o1re
mo1ra
mo1ro
mo1rø
mo1st
mo2t1el
mo1te
mot1a
2m1om1r
m1m
mmi3sj
m1mi
mmi2s
1muf
1mun
mu1ni
mu1na
mu1en
mu1es
mu1re
mus1t
mus1k
mug1
mu1ta
mu1le
3må.
2må1r
1måd
må1s2
må1k
må1p
1må1le
1mé
uft3v
u2ft
uf1ta
ufo2r1s2
ui2d
u1is
u1it
unn1sl
un2no
und3rin2g.
undrin4
un4drer
un1dre
un1do
unst3en
uns2t
uns1te
un2so
un1t1h
un2tri
un1tr
u1ef
ue3ni2g.
ue3ni1ge
u1er
u1e1a
ue1sk
uespil4le2r.
ue1sp
ues2pil
uespil1le
uespil4let
u1et
u1ek
ue1p
u1el
ueår1
ue1å
u2h
u3ha
u1ve1d
uran1
ur1ar
u1ral
ur3de
ur1s1a
u2rs2
ur1sk
urke1s
u2rk
ur1ke
u2r1p
ur1on
uro1s
u1ry
u1ru
urå1
uan1
u1ar
uad1
u1as
uat1
u1al
ual3d
2ud
udi2er
u1di
u3die
udi3et.
u1dr
uds2v
ud1sk
uds1p
u1do
u1dé
usi1vi3
u1si
usi1kr
us1n
u2s1ei
u1se
us1ar
us2sa
u2ss
us1s2t
us1sp
uss1l
us1so
us1tik
us2tes
us1te
us1tre
us3tra3sjo2n.
ustrasjo4
ustra1sj
ustrasjon2
u1stj
ustjer2
u2s1kv
us1kr
us1kl
us1ku
us1p
us1l
u1so
u1som2m
us2ma
u1gle1a
u1gle1b
ug1la
u1go
u2te1s
u1te
ut1e2ks
ut2he
ut1h
1ut1v
ut3rett2e.
utre2tt
utret1te
ut3rettet
ut1rop
ut1ru
ut1ar
1ut1d
ut1s2
1ut1s2t
1utsk
1ut1g
ut1to
u2tt
1ut1b
u1to1
ut1o2v
ut1op
ut1øv
uk1ni
u3k2em
u1ke
u1ka
uk2s1p
u2ks
uks1l
uk2so
uk1ki
uk1kø
u1pi
u1pe
upp2
up1pl
u2p1u
u1l2e.
u1len
u1ler
uleak2
ule1a
u1le1st
ule1u
ul1af
ul1ak
ul2sy
u2l1s
u1læ
ul3ler
ul1le
1uly
ul1må
u1lu
u2b
u3bi
u3bl
ub3lin
ub2li
ub1j
u1o1e
uom1
umu1
u1mø
u1um
u1å
uår1
u1øy
u1c
u1w
å1f
å1i
å1ni
ån2da
ånd1sk
ån1s
å1e
å1v
åvirk3n
åvi2rk
å1r2e.
å1red
år1a
år1sak4
å2rs2
år2st
år3sta
2år2sj
år1on
å1a
åa1l
åde1st
å1de
åd1ri
åd1sn
åd1sl
å1do
ås2
ås3si
å2ss
åss1k
ås3t2e.
ås1te
å1sk
å2s3k2e.
ås1ke
å2s3ken
åska1l
å1sp
å1g
å1ti
å1ta
åt1sk
åts1l
ått1o
å2tt
å1ki
åk1ni
åk1v
åkra1ti2
å1ka
å1kle
å1kj
å1ko
å1pi
å1pa
åp2s1
å1li
å1le
å2l1en1h
ål1v
å1la
ål2s1te
å2l1s
åls2t
å1lo
å1ly
ål1u
å1j
åbe1
å1b
å1o
ø2fl
ø1fo
ø1in
ø1is
ø1ni
ø1na
øn1d
øn1s
ø1e
ø1ve
øve1st
øv1r
ø1ri
ørne1s2
ør1ne
ø1re
ør1a
ørda1g3e
ørda2g
ør1da
ør1sp
ø2rs2
ør3so
ør4get
ør1g
ør1ge
ør2kla
ø2rk
ør1kl
ør1ko1
øro2
ør1ov
ø1ru
ør1å
ør1ø
ø1a
øde1st
ø1de
ø1dr
øds1a
ød1sty
øds2t
øds1k
ø2du
øs1n
øs1ak
ø2s1s
øs1ti
øst1ov
øs1kj
øg2na
ø2g1s
ø1ti
ø1tr
øt1a
øt1sa
øtt1s
ø2tt
ø1ki
øk1n
ø1kv
ø1ka
øk1s2t
ø2ks
øk1sk
ø1kl
1øko1
ø1pi
ø3pe
øp1li
ø1ple
ø1li
ø1le
øl1va
ø1la
øy1s1i
øy1tr
øm1st
øms2
1xi
xan1
x1k
xko2
x1m
x1u
é1e
é1d
é1g
1ci
c2h
1cr
1ca
ca1n
ca1ro
ca1g
cæ1
con1
co1v
co1r
com2
1cu
cu1pr
cu3b
1we
1wa
1q
qu1
z1f
1zi
1ze
1za
zas1
zo1f
1zy
z1m
ü1r
ôr1i
ô1re
